Washington statutes.
RCW 19.28.361

Liability for injury or damage.

Nothing contained in this chapter will be construed to relieve from or lessen the responsibility or liability of any person for injury or damage to person or property caused by or resulting from any defect of any nature in any electrical or telecommunications work performed by said person or in any electrical or telecommunications equipment owned, controlled, installed, operated or used by him or her; nor shall the state of Washington, or any officer, agent, or employee thereof incur or be held as assuming any liability by reason or in consequence of any permission, certificate of inspection, inspection or approval authorized herein, or issued or given as herein provided, or by reason of consequence of any things done or acts performed pursuant to any provision of this chapter.

[ 2000 c 238 s 5; 1935 c 169 s 16; RRS s 8307-16. Formerly RCW 19.28.340.]

NOTES:

Severability—2000 c 238: See note following RCW 19.28.301.